apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGUOKTE
guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#guokte%> K ;
guokte+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#guokti%>n K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#guokte%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#guovtti%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#guovtte»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#guovtti%>s K ;
 guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#guovtti%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#guoktá%>j K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#guovtti%>t K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#guvtti%>jde K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#guvtti%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGUOKTE
guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#guokte%> K ;
guokte+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#guokti%>n K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#guokte%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#guovtti%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#guovtte»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#guovtti%>s K ;
 guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#guovtti%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#guoktá%>j K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#guovtti%>t K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#guvtti%>jde K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#guvtti%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA
golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Ess:%>#logi#golbma%>n K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#golmma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#golmma»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#golmma%>s K ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#golmma%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#golbmi%>j K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#golmma%>t K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#golmma%>jde K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#golmma%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA
golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Ess:%>#logi#golbma%>n K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#golmma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#golmma»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#golmma%>s K ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#golmma%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#golbmi%>j K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#golmma%>t K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#golmma%>jde K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#golmma%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA
golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#golbma%>n K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#golmma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#golmma»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#golmma%>s K ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#golmma%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#golbmi%>j K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#golmma%>t K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#golmma%>jde K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#guvtti%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA
golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#golbma%>n K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#golbma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#golmma%> K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#golmma»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#golmma%>s K ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#golmma%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#golbmi%>j K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#golmma%>t K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#golmma%>jde K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#golmma%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:%>#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#njealji%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#njealje»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#njealji%>s K ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#njelji%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:%>#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#njealji%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#njealje»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#njealji%>s K ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#njelji%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#njealji%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#njealje»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#njealji%>s K ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#njelji%>guin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#njeallje%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#njealji%> K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#njealje»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#njealji%>s K ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#njelji%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:%>#logi#vihtta%>n K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#viđa%>  K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#viđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#viđa%>s K ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#viđa%>jguin K ;

LEXICON 21TO99
guokte#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGIGUOKTE ;
guokte#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA ;
guokte#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE ;
golbma#logi#:golbma GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA ;
golbma#logi#:golbma GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
golbma#logi#:golbma GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGIGUOKTE ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGIGUOKTE ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGIGUOKTE ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE ;
čieža#logi#:čieža GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA ;
gieža#logi#:gieža GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA ;
čieža#logi#:čieža GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
gieža#logi#:gieža GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
čieža#logi#:čieža GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA ;
gieža#logi#:gieža GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA ;
gávcci#logi#:gák'ci GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA ;
gávcci#logi#:gák'ci GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
ovcci#logi#:ok'ci GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA ;
ovcci#logi#:ok'ci GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
